Wisconsin, session 2025, AB707.
do enact as follows:AB707,11Section 1. 20.370 (2) (cr) of the statutes is amended to read:AB707,2,5220.370 (2) (cr) Forestry — recording fees. From the conservation fund, all 3moneys received under ss. 77.82 (2m) (d) and (4) and 77.88 (1) (c), (2) (ac) 1., 2., and 43., (am), and (c), (3), (3j) (c), and (3m) for the payment of fees to the registers of 5deeds under s. 77.91 (5).AB707,26Section 2. 77.88 (2) (ac) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB707,2,21777.88 (2) (ac) 1. If the land transferred under par. (a) meets the eligibility 8requirements under s. 77.82 (1) (a), (ag), and (b), the land shall continue to be 9designated as managed forest land if the transferee, within 30 days after a transfer 10of ownership, files a form provided by the department signed by the transferee. By 11signing the form, the transferee certifies to the department an intent to comply 12with the existing management plan for the land and any amendments to the plan. 13The transferee shall provide proof that each person holding any encumbrance on 14the land agrees to the designation. The transferee may designate an area of the 15transferred land closed to public access as provided under s. 77.83. The department 16shall issue an order continuing the designation of the land as managed forest land 17under the new ownership. The transferee shall pay a $100 fee that will accompany 18the report. The fee shall be deposited in the conservation fund. Twenty dollars of 19the fee or a different amount of the fee as may be established under subd. 2. shall be 20and credited to the appropriation under s. 20.370 (2) (cr). The department shall 21immediately notify each person entitled to notice under s. 77.82 (8).AB707,322Section 3. 77.88 (5m) of the statutes is amended to read:AB707,3,4177.88 (5m) Withdrawal fee. The withdrawal fee assessed by the 2department under subs. (1) (c), (2) (ac) 2. and 3., (am), and (c), (3), and (3j) (c), and 3(3m) shall be $300. The fee shall be deposited in the conservation fund and credited 4to the appropriation under s. 20.370 (2) (cr).AB707,3,55